Hawaii statutes.
§385-7 Disqualification for additional
unemployment benefits. A claimant shall be disqualified for additional
unemployment benefits:

(1) Voluntary separation. For any week in which the
claimant has left work voluntarily without good cause and for not more than
seven consecutive weeks of unemployment which immediately follow such week, as
determined according to the circumstances in each case.

An owner-employee of a corporation who
brings about the owner-employee's unemployment by divesting ownership, leasing
the business interest, terminating the business, or by other similar actions
where the owner-employee is the party initiating termination of the employment
relationship, has voluntarily left employment.

(2) Discharge for misconduct. For the week in which
the claimant has been discharged for misconduct connected with work and for not
more than seven consecutive weeks of unemployment which immediately follow such
week, as determined in each case in accordance with the seriousness of the
misconduct.

(3) Failure to apply for work, etc. If the claimant
has failed, without good cause, either to apply for available, suitable work
when so directed by the director or any duly authorized representative of the
director, or to accept suitable work when offered to the claimant. The
disqualification shall continue for the week in which such failure occurred and
for not more than seven consecutive weeks of unemployment which immediately
follow such week, as determined according to the circumstances of each case.

(A) In determining whether or not any work is
suitable for a claimant there shall be considered among other factors and in
addition to those enumerated in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the degree
of risk involved to the claimant's health, safety, and morals, the claimant's
physical fitness and prior training, the claimant's experience and prior
earnings, the length of unemployment, the claimant's prospects for obtaining
work in the claimant's customary occupation, and the distance of available work
from the claimant's residence and prospects for obtaining local work.

(B) No work shall be deemed suitable and
benefits shall not be denied under this chapter to any otherwise eligible
claimant for refusing to accept new work under any of the following conditions:

(i) If the position offered is vacant due
directly to a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute;

(ii) If the wages, hours, or other conditions
of the work offered are substantially less favorable to the claimant than those
prevailing for similar work in the locality;

(iii) If as a condition of being employed the
claimant would be required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain
from joining any bona fide labor organization.

(4) Labor dispute. For any week with respect to
which it is found that the claimant's unemployment is due to a stoppage of work
which exists because of a labor dispute at the factory, establishments, or
other premises at which the claimant is or was last employed; provided that
this paragraph shall not apply if it is shown that:

(A) The claimant is not participating in or
directly interested in the labor dispute which caused the stoppage of work; and

(B) The claimant does not belong to a grade
or class of workers of which, immediately before the commencement of the
stoppage, there were members employed at the premises at which the stoppage
occurs, any of whom are participating in or directly interested in the dispute;

provided that if in any case separate
branches of work which are commonly conducted as separate businesses in
separate premises, are conducted in separate departments of the same premises,
each such department shall, for the purpose of this paragraph be deemed to be a
separate factory, establishment, or other premises.

(5) Fraud. If the director finds that the claimant
has made a false statement or representation knowing it to be false or
knowingly fails to disclose a material fact to obtain any additional
unemployment benefits under this chapter, in which case the claimant shall be
disqualified for the week in which the director makes such determination and
for the remainder of the weeks for which the claimant would otherwise be
eligible. [L 1961, c 157, pt of §1; Supp, §93B-8; HRS §385-7; am L 1972, c 47,
§4; am L 1973, c 159, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 162, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next